California statutes. Public Resources Code
(c) With the prior permission of the board of supervisors of the principal county, or in the case of a district which contains no unincorporated territory with the prior permission of the city council, a board of directors may adopt an ordinance that makes the employees of the district subject to the employee relations system of the principal county or that city. The board of directors may adopt an ordinance that withdraws the employees of the district from the employee relations system of the principal county or that city. A district in which the employees of the district are subject to the employee relations system of the principal county or that city shall receive employee relations services at cost from the county or city.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 15, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

5786.21.

If a county board of supervisors has appointed itself as the board of directors and the county has by ordinance provided a civil service system:

(a) A county employee holding a classified civil service position for which eligibility has been established by a competitive examination and certification, and which is similar in grade or class to a district position, shall, at the district’s request, be certified by the county civil service commission as being eligible to transfer to and hold that position in the district with the same status and without further examination.

(b) A district employee holding a classified civil service position for which eligibility has been established by a competitive examination and certification, and that is similar in grade or class to a county position, shall, at the county’s request, be certified by the county civil service commission as being eligible to transfer to and hold that position in the county with the same status and without further examination.

(c) Any person entitled to participate in promotional examinations for classified civil service positions in either the county or the district shall be entitled to participate in promotional examinations for classified civil service positions for both the county and the district, pursuant to the civil service commission’s rules, and to be certified for those positions by the county civil service commission or board of supervisors, and to be appointed to those positions.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 15, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

5786.23.

(a) This section shall apply only to a district where all of the following apply:

(1) The county board of supervisors has appointed itself as the board of directors.

(2) The county has by ordinance provided a civil service system.

(3) The county operates under a freeholders’ charter that requires that in the fixing of salaries or wages for county employees subject to the county’s civil service system, the board of supervisors shall provide a salary or wage at least equal to the prevailing salary or wage for the same quality of service rendered to private persons under similar employment, if the prevailing salary or wage can be ascertained.

(b) In fixing the salary or wage for district employees subject to the county’s civil service system, the board of directors shall provide a salary or wage equal to the salary or wage paid to county employees for the same quality of service.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 15, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

5786.25.

A board of directors may require any employee or officer to be bonded. The district shall pay the cost of the bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 15, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

5786.27.

A board of directors may provide for any programs for the benefit of its employees and members of the board of directors pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 53200) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 15, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

5786.29.

A district may authorize the members of its board of directors and its employees to attend professional or vocational meetings and pay their actual and necessary traveling and incidental expenses while on official business.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 15, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

5786.31.

Whenever the boundaries of a district or a zone change, the district shall comply with Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 54900) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 158, Sec. 29.1.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Elections [5787. - 5787.3.]

5787.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, districts are subject to the Uniform District Election Law, Part 4 (commencing with Section 10500) of Division 10 of the Elections Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 15, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

5787.1.

A board of directors may require that the election of members to the board of directors shall be held on the same day as the statewide general election pursuant to Section 10404 of the Elections Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 15, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

5787.3.

If the proposition on the question of formation fails, the county or counties shall pay the expenses of the election. If the proposition on the question of formation passes, the expense shall be a charge against the district and repaid to the county or counties from the first moneys collected by the district. The expense of all other elections shall be a charge against the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 15, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Finance [5788. - 5788.25.]

5788.

On or before July 1 of each year, the board of directors shall adopt a preliminary budget that shall conform to the accounting and budgeting procedures for special districts contained in Subchapter 3 (commencing with Section 1031.1) of, and Article 1 (commencing with Section 1121) of Subchapter 4 of Division 2 of Title 2 of the California Code of Regulations. The board of directors may divide the preliminary budget into categories, including, but not limited to:

(a) Maintenance and operation.

(b) Employee compensation.

(c) Capital outlay.

(d) Interest and redemption for indebtedness.

(e) Restricted reserve for capital outlay.

(f) Restricted reserve for contingencies.

(g) Unallocated general reserve.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 15, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

5788.1.

(a) On or before July 1 of each year, the board of directors shall publish a notice stating all of the following:

(1) That it has adopted a preliminary budget that is available for inspection at a time and place within the district specified in the notice.

(2) The date, time, and place when the board of directors will meet to adopt the final budget and that any person may appear and be heard regarding any item in the budget or regarding the addition of other items.

(b) The board of directors shall publish the notice at least two weeks before the hearing in at least one newspaper of general circulation in the district pursuant to Section 6061 of the Government Code.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 15, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

5788.3.

At the time and place specified for the meeting, any person may appear and be heard regarding any item in the budget or regarding the addition of other items. The hearing on the budget may be continued from time to time.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 15, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

5788.5.

On or before August 30 of each year, after making any changes in the preliminary budget, the board of directors shall adopt a final budget. The board of directors shall forward a copy of the final budget to the auditor of each county in which the district is located.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 15, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

5788.7.

At any regular meeting or properly noticed special meeting after the adoption of its final budget, the board of directors may adopt a resolution amending the budget and ordering the transfer of funds between categories, other than transfers from the restricted reserve for capital outlay and the restricted reserve for contingencies.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 15, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

5788.9.

(a) In its annual budget, the board of directors may establish a restricted reserve for capital outlay and a restricted reserve for contingencies. When the board of directors establishes a restricted reserve, it shall declare the exclusive purposes for which the funds in the reserve may be spent. The funds in the restricted reserve shall be spent only for the exclusive purposes for which the board of directors established the restricted reserve. The reserves shall be maintained according to generally accepted accounting principles.

(b) Any time after the establishment of a restricted reserve, the board of directors may transfer any funds to that restricted reserve.

(c) If the board of directors finds that the funds in a restricted reserve are no longer required for the purpose for which the restricted reserve was established, the board of directors may, by a four-fifths vote of the total membership of the board of directors, discontinue the restricted reserve or transfer any funds that are no longer required from the restricted reserve to the district’s general fund.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 15, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

5788.11.

On or before July 1 of each year, the board of directors shall adopt a resolution establishing its appropriations limit and make other necessary determinations for the following fiscal year pursuant to Article XIII B of the California Constitution and Division 9 (commencing with Section 7900) of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 15, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

5788.13.

The auditor of each county in which a district is located shall allocate to the district its share of property tax revenue pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 95) of Part 0.5 of Division 1 of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 15, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

5788.15.

On or before July 1 of any year, the city council of a city which is located wholly or partially within a district may adopt a resolution ordering the transfer of funds from the city to the district in an amount equal to the entire or partial amount of property tax revenue that would have been allocated to the district from the territory that is located both in the city and the district. The city shall file certified copies of its resolution with the district and the county auditor. Pursuant to Section 96.8 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, the county auditor shall compute and implement an effective tax rate reduction. A city’s decision to pay funds to a district in lieu of property tax revenues is effective only for the fiscal year for which it is made.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 15, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

5788.17.

(a) A district may accept any revenue, money, grants, goods, or services from any federal, state, regional, or local agency or from any person for any lawful purpose of the district.

(b) In addition to any other existing authority, a district may borrow money and incur indebtedness pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 53820), Article 7.4 (commencing with Section 53835), Article 7.5 (commencing with Section 53840), Article 7.6 (commencing with Section 53850), and Article 7.7 (commencing with Section 53859) of Chapter 4 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 699, Sec. 35.5.   (SB 894)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

5788.19.

A local agency may loan any of its available funds to a district.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 15, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

5788.21.

(a) A district may acquire any necessary real property by borrowing money or purchasing on contract pursuant to this section. That indebtedness shall be in addition to any bonded indebtedness authorized by the voters.

(b) The amount of indebtedness shall not exceed an amount equal to two times the actual income from property tax revenues received pursuant to Section 5788.13 for the fiscal year preceding the year in which the indebtedness is incurred. Any indebtedness shall be repaid within 10 years from the date on which it is incurred. An indebtedness shall bear interest at a rate which shall not exceed the rate permitted under Article 7 (commencing with Section 53530) of Chapter 3 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code.

(c) Each indebtedness shall be authorized by a resolution adopted by a four-fifths vote of the total membership of the board of directors and shall be evidenced by a promissory note or contract signed by the chair and the secretary or the clerk of the board of directors.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 15, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

5788.23.

(a) All claims for money or damages against a district are governed by Part 3 (commencing with Section 900) and Part 4 (commencing with Section 940) of Division 3.6 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(b) All claims against a district shall be audited, allowed, and paid by the board of directors by warrants drawn on the treasurer.

(c) As an alternative to subdivision (b), the board of directors may instruct the county auditor to audit, allow, and draw his or her warrant on the county treasurer for all legal claims presented to him or her and authorized by the board of directors.

(d) The treasurer shall pay the warrants in the order in which they are presented.

(e) If a warrant is presented for payment and the treasurer cannot pay it for want of funds in the account on which it is drawn, the treasurer shall endorse the warrant, “NOT PAID BECAUSE OF INSUFFICIENT FUNDS” and sign his or her name and the date and time the warrant was presented. From that time until it is paid, the warrant bears interest at the maximum rate permitted pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 53530) of Chapter 3 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 15, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

5788.25.

(a) The board of directors shall provide for regular audits of the district’s accounts and records pursuant to Section 26909 of the Government Code.

(b) The board of directors shall provide for the annual financial reports to the Controller pursuant to Article 9 (commencing with Section 53890) of Chapter 4 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 15, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Alternative Revenues [5789. - 5789.5.]

5789.

Whenever a board of directors determines that the amount of revenue available to the district or any of its zones is inadequate to meet the costs of providing facilities, programs, and services pursuant to Section 5786, the board of directors may raise revenues pursuant to this article or any other provision of law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 15, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

5789.1.

A district may levy special taxes pursuant to:

(a) Article 3.5 (commencing with Section 50075) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 1 of Title 5 of the Government Code. The special taxes shall be applied uniformly to all taxpayers or all real property within the district, except that unimproved property may be taxed at a lower rate than improved property.

(b) The Mello-Roos Community Facilities Act of 1982, Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 53311) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 15, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

5789.3.

A district may levy special benefit assessments consistent with the requirements of Article XIIID of the California Constitution to finance capital improvements, including, but not limited to, special benefit assessments levied pursuant to:

(a) The Improvement Act of 1911, Division 7 (commencing with Section 5000) of the Streets and Highways Code.

(b) The Improvement Bond Act of 1915, Division 15 (commencing with Section 8500) of the Streets and Highways Code.

(c) The Municipal Improvement Act of 1913, Division 12 (commencing with Section 10000) of the Streets and Highways Code.

(d) The Landscaping and Lighting Assessment Act of 1972, Part 2 (commencing with Section 22500) of Division 15 of the Streets and Highways Code.

(e) Any other statutory authorization enacted in the future.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 15, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

5789.5.

(a) A board of directors may charge a fee to cover the cost of any service which the district provides or the cost of enforcing any regulation for which the fee is charged. No fee shall exceed the costs reasonably borne by the district in providing the service or enforcing the regulation for which the fee is charged.

(b) Before imposing or increasing any fee for property-related services, a board of directors shall follow the procedures in Section 6 of Article XIIID of the California Constitution.

(c) A board of directors may charge residents or taxpayers of the district a fee authorized by this section which is less than the fee which it charges to nonresidents or nontaxpayers of the district.

(d) A board of directors may authorize district employees to waive the payment, in whole or in part, of a fee authorized by this section when the board of directors determines that payment would not be in the public interest. Before authorizing any waiver, a board of directors shall adopt a resolution which specifies the policies and procedures governing waivers.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 15, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 11. General Obligation Bonds [5790. - 5790.17.]

5790.

(a) Whenever a board of directors determines that it is necessary to incur a general obligation bonded indebtedness for the acquisition or improvement of real property or for funding or refunding of any outstanding indebtedness, the board of directors shall adopt a resolution making determinations and calling an election on a proposition to incur indebtedness.

(b) The amount of the bonds to be issued shall not exceed the amount specified in the resolution calling the election.

(c) A district shall not incur bonded indebtedness that exceeds 10 percent of the assessed value of all taxable property in the district at the time the bonds are issued.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 15, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

5790.1.

The resolution shall state:

(a) The purpose for which the proposed debt is to be incurred, which may include expenses for the authorization, issuance, and sale of bonds.

(b) The amount of the debt to be incurred.

(c) The maximum term of the bonds, not to exceed 30 years.

(d) The maximum rate of interest to be paid, not to exceed the maximum rate permitted pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 53530) of Chapter 3 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code.

(e) The measure to be submitted to the voters.

(f) The date the election will be held.

(g) Any other matters that are required pursuant to Article 1.5 (commencing with Section 53410) of Chapter 3 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code.

(h) Any other matters that are required pursuant to the Uniform District Election Law, Part 4 (commencing with Section 10500) of Division 10 of the Elections Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 15, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

5790.3.

(a) The election shall be conducted pursuant to the Uniform District Election Law, Part 4 (commencing with Section 10500) of Division 10 of the Elections Code.

(b) If two-thirds of the voters voting on the proposition favor incurring the indebtedness and issuing the bonds, the board of directors may incur the indebtedness and issue the bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 15, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

5790.5.

(a) The board of directors may provide for the issuance of bonds in any amounts, in any series, and on any terms, provided that they do not exceed the limits approved by the voters.

(b) The board of directors shall adopt a resolution prescribing the form and denomination of the bonds. The resolution shall specify the dates on which all or any part of the principal shall become due and payable. The payment of the first installment or principal may be deferred for a maximum period not to exceed five years from the date on which the board of directors issues the first bonds or first bonds in each series.

(c) The bonds shall be dated, numbered consecutively, and signed by the chair of the board of directors and the treasurer. Signatures may be facsimiles and may be mechanically reproduced by any means, provided that one of the signatures shall be signed by hand. If the chair of the board of directors or the treasurer whose signature appears on a bond ceases to hold that office before the delivery of the bonds to the purchaser, the signature is nevertheless valid for all purposes connected with that bond.

(d) The board of directors may provide for the call and redemption of bonds before their maturity at times and prices and upon any other terms as it specifies.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 15, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

5790.7.

(a) Before selling the bonds, the board of directors shall give notice inviting sealed bids. At a minimum, the board of directors shall publish notice at least once in a newspaper of general circulation in the district at least 10 days before the deadline for receiving the bids.

(b) The board of directors shall award the sale of the bonds to the highest responsible bidder.

(c) If the board of directors does not receive any bids or if it determines that the bids received are not satisfactory as to price or responsibility of the bidders, the board of directors may reject all bids, if any, and either readvertise or sell the bonds at private sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 15, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

5790.9.

Any general obligation bonds issued by a district shall have the same force, value, and use as bonds issued by a city and the bonds and interest on the bonds are exempt from all taxation within the State of California.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 15, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

5790.11.

(a) All premiums and accrued interest received from the sale of the bonds shall be deposited with the treasurer in a special bond service fund to be used for the payment of the principal of and interest on the bonds, and the remainder of the proceeds of the bonds shall be placed to the credit of the proper improvement fund and applied exclusively to the purposes stated in the proposition approved by the voters.

(b) When the purpose has been accomplished, any moneys remaining in the improvement fund shall be transferred to the special bond fund. When the purpose has been accomplished and all principal and interest on the bonds have been paid, any balance of money then remaining shall be transferred to the district’s general fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 15, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

5790.13.

For any bond approved by the voters on or after January 1, 2001, the treasurer shall file the annual report required pursuant to Article 1.5 (commencing with Section 53410) of Chapter 3 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 15, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

5790.15.

(a) After incurring a general obligation indebtedness, and annually thereafter until the indebtedness is paid or until there is a sum in the district treasury in a special bond service fund set apart for that purpose that is sufficient to meet all payments of principal and interest on that indebtedness as it becomes due, the board of directors shall adopt a resolution directing the county tax collector to levy a tax on behalf of the district.

(b) The tax shall be in addition to all other taxes levied by and for the district and shall be collected in the same manner and at the same time as county taxes. A county may recover its costs as provided in Section 29142 of the Government Code.

(c) The rate of the tax shall be fixed to result in proceeds that are sufficient to pay any principal and interest that will become due before the next proceeds of a tax to be levied will be available.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 15, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

5790.17.

If a district dissolves after incurring a general obligation indebtedness, the property in the territory that constituted the district at the time of its dissolution shall continue to be subject to tax sufficient to pay any principal, interest, and any other amounts owning on account of that obligation, as they become due. Any order of dissolution pursuant to the Cortese-Knox-Hertzberg Local Government Reorganization Act of 2000, Part 1 (commencing with Section 56000) of Division 3 of Title 5 of the Government Code shall impose that obligation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 15, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 12. Zones [5791. - 5791.7.]

5791.

(a) Whenever a board of directors determines that it is in the public interest to provide different services, to provide different levels of service, or to raise additional revenues within specific areas of the district, it may form one or more zones pursuant to this article.

(b) The board of directors shall initiate proceedings for the formation of a new zone by adopting a resolution that does all of the following:

(1) States that the proposal is made pursuant to this article.

(2) Sets forth a description of the boundaries of the territory to be included in the zone.

(3) States the different services, different levels of service, or additional revenues that the zone will provide.

(4) Sets forth the methods by which those services or levels of service will be financed.

(5) States the reasons for forming the zone.

(6) Proposes a name or number for the zone.

(c) A proposal to form a new zone may also be initiated by a petition signed by not less than 10 percent of the registered voters residing within the proposed zone. The petition shall contain all of the matters required by subdivision (b).

(d) Upon the adoption of a resolution or the receipt of a valid petition, the board of directors shall fix the date, time, and place for the public hearing on the formation of the zone. The board of directors shall publish notice of the hearing, including the information required by subdivision (b), pursuant to Section 6061 of the Government Code in one or more newspapers of general circulation in the district. The board of directors shall mail the notice at least 20 days before the date of the hearing to all owners of property within the proposed zone. The board of directors shall post the notice in at least three public places within the territory of the proposed zone.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 15, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

5791.1.

(a) At the hearing, the board of directors shall hear and consider any protests to the formation of the zone. If, at the conclusion of the hearing, the board of directors determines either (1) that more than 50 percent of the total number of voters residing within the proposed zone have filed written objections to the formation or (2) that property owners who own more than 50 percent of the assessed value of all taxable property in the proposed zone have filed written objections to the formation, then the board of directors shall terminate the proceedings. If the board of directors determines that the written objections have been filed by 50 percent or less of those voters or property owners, then the board of directors may proceed to form the zone.

(b) If the resolution or petition proposes that the zone use special taxes, benefit assessments, fees, or general obligation bonds to finance its purposes, the board of directors shall proceed according to law. If the voters or property owners do not approve those funding methods, the zone shall not be formed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 76, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

5791.3.

A board of directors may change the boundaries of a zone or dissolve a zone by following the procedures in Sections 5791 and 5791.1.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 15, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

5791.5.

A local agency formation commission shall have no power or duty to review and approve or disapprove a proposal to form a zone, a proposal to change the boundaries of a zone, or a proposal to dissolve a zone.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 15, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

5791.7.

(a) As determined by the board of directors, a zone may provide any service at any level within its boundaries that the district may provide.

(b) As determined by the board of directors and pursuant to the requirements of this chapter, a zone may exercise any fiscal powers within its boundaries that the district may exercise.

(c) Any special taxes, benefit assessments, fees, or general obligation bonds that are intended solely for the support of services within a zone shall be levied, assessed, and charged within the boundaries of the zone.

(d) A zone shall not incur a bonded indebtedness that exceeds the limit specified in subdivision (c) of Section 5790. Any bonded indebtedness of the entire district shall be included in computing that limit.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 15, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 13. Lower Los Angeles River Recreation and Park District [5795. - 5795.20.]

5795.

(a) The Lower Los Angeles River Recreation and Park District may be established subject to this chapter and the Cortese-Knox-Hertzberg Local Government Reorganization Act of 2000 (Division 3 (commencing with Section 56000) of Title 5 of the Government Code).

(b) A petition or resolution to establish the district pursuant to this article and Article 3 (commencing with Section 5782) may not be submitted to the Los Angeles County Local Agency Formation Commission on or after January 1, 2021.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 453, Sec. 1.   (SB 875)   Effective September 17, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

5795.5.

For purposes of this article, “district” means the Lower Los Angeles River Recreation and Park District.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 486, Sec. 1.   (SB 1374)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

5795.10.

Notwithstanding Article 4 (commencing with Section 5783), the initial board of directors of the district shall consist of no more than 17 members, as follows:

(a) The city council of each of the following cities may appoint one representative:

(1) The City of Vernon.

(2) The City of Maywood.

(3) The City of Bell.

(4) The City of Bell Gardens.

(5) The City of Cudahy.

(6) The City of South Gate.

(7) The City of Lynwood.

(8) The City of Compton.

(9) The City of Paramount.

(10) The City of Long Beach.

(11) The City of Commerce.

(12) The City of Downey.

(13) The City of Montebello.

(14) The City of Pico Rivera.

(b) The Los Angeles County Board of Supervisors may
 appoint
 three public members. One of those members shall be a representative of a nonprofit organization serving the Lower Los Angeles River region.

(c) A person appointed to the board of directors shall serve at the pleasure of the city council or county board of supervisors that made the appointment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 761, Sec. 1.   (SB 268)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

5795.15.

The board of directors may be reorganized pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 5785).

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 486, Sec. 1.   (SB 1374)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

5795.20.

(a) In addition to the powers enumerated in Article 7 (commencing with Section 5786), which shall be subject to review and approval by the Los Angeles County Local Agency Formation Commission upon formation, change of organization, or reorganization under the Cortese-Knox-Hertzberg Local Government Reorganization Act of 2000 (Division 3 (commencing with Section 56000) of Title 5 of the Government Code), and to the financing authority provided by Article 9 (commencing with Section 5788), Article 10 (commencing with Section 5789), and Article 11 (commencing with Section 5790), the district shall do all of the following:

(1) Promote the development of open space and parks along the Lower Los Angeles River.

(2) Identify funding and resources to promote the revitalization of the Lower Los Angeles River and open spaces along the river for the benefit and enjoyment of local communities.

(3) Acquire, construct, improve, maintain, and operate parks and open space along the Lower Los Angeles River.

(b) The district shall conduct the activities specified in paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, of subdivision (a) in coordination with the Lower Los Angeles River Working Group established pursuant to Section 32622 and the San Gabriel and Lower Los Angeles Rivers and Mountains Conservancy established pursuant to Division 22.8 (commencing with Section 32600), which have certain responsibilities regarding the Lower Los Angeles River.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 561, Sec. 205.   (AB 1516)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 14. Lower San Gabriel River Recreation and Park District  [5796. - 5796.20.]

5796.

(a) The Lower San Gabriel River Recreation and Park District may be established subject to this chapter and the Cortese-Knox-Hertzberg Local Government Reorganization Act of 2000 (Division 3 (commencing with Section 56000) of Title 5 of the Government Code).

(b) A petition or resolution to establish the district pursuant to this article and Article 3 (commencing with Section 5782) shall not be submitted to the Los Angeles County Local Agency Formation Commission on or after January 1, 2024.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 761, Sec. 2.   (SB 268)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

5796.5.

For purposes of this article, “district” means the Lower San Gabriel River Recreation and Park District.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 466, Sec. 1.   (SB 693)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

5796.10.

Notwithstanding Article 4 (commencing with Section 5783), the initial board of directors of the district shall consist of no more than 15 members, as follows:

(a) The city council of each of the following cities may appoint one representative:

(1) The City of Downey.

(2) The City of Whittier.

(3) The City of Pico Rivera.

(4) The City of Norwalk.

(5) The City of Santa Fe Springs.

(6) The City of Artesia.

(7) The City of Bellflower.

(8) The City of Cerritos.

(9) The City of Lakewood.

(10) The City of Hawaiian Gardens.

(11) The City of Long Beach.

(b) The Los Angeles County Board of Supervisors may appoint two public
 members. These members shall reside in the Lower San Gabriel River region.

(c) The executive officer of the San Gabriel and Lower Los Angeles Rivers and Mountains Conservancy established pursuant to Division 22.8 (commencing with Section 32600) may serve as a member.

(d) The other members of the initial board of directors may appoint one public member. This member both shall be a representative of a nonprofit organization that serves the Lower San Gabriel River region and specializes in open space public education, and outdoor activities, and shall reside in the Lower San Gabriel River region.

(e) A person appointed to the board of directors pursuant to subdivision
 (a) or (b) shall serve at the pleasure of the city council or county board of supervisors that made the appointment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 761, Sec. 3.   (SB 268)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

5796.15.

The board of directors may be reorganized pursuant to Article 6 (commencing with Section 5785).

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 466, Sec. 1.   (SB 693)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

5796.20.

(a) In addition to the powers enumerated in Article 7 (commencing with Section 5786), which shall be subject to review and approval by the Los Angeles County Local Agency Formation Commission upon formation, change of organization, or reorganization under the Cortese-Knox-Hertzberg Local Government Reorganization Act of 2000 (Division 3 (commencing with Section 56000) of Title 5 of the Government Code), and to the financing authority provided by Article 9 (commencing with Section 5788), Article 10 (commencing with Section 5789), and Article 11 (commencing with Section 5790), the district shall do all of the following:

(1) Promote the development of open space and parks along the Lower
 San Gabriel River.

(2) Identify funding and resources to promote the revitalization of the Lower San Gabriel River and open spaces along the river for the benefit and enjoyment of local communities.

(3) Acquire, construct, improve, maintain, and operate parks and open space along the Lower San Gabriel River.

(b) The district shall conduct the activities specified in paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, of subdivision (a) in coordination with the San Gabriel and Lower Los Angeles Rivers and Mountains Conservancy established pursuant to Division 22.8 (commencing with Section 32600), which has certain responsibilities regarding the Lower San Gabriel River.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 761, Sec. 4.   (SB 268)   Effective January 1, 2022.)